District of Columbia statutes.
44-717

Home for Aged and Infirm — Admission of pay patients.

Pay patients may be admitted to the Home for the Aged and Infirm for care and treatment at such rates and under such regulations as may be established by the Council of the District of Columbia, insofar as such admissions will not interfere with admission of indigent patients; provided, however, that the rates shall not exceed the estimated per capita cost for the current year.

June 14, 1950, 64 Stat. 212, ch. 235
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(256) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5062 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) addition of provisions concerning hospital receivership, see § 3 of the Long-Term Care Stabilization Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-444, Oct. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 10755, 20 STAT 4165).
1973 Ed., § 32-1010.
1981 Ed., § 32-1209.